src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-lex_alga_gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

# ok

Tests:

  
  Noun - algâ:
    algâ+N+Sg+Nom: algâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Gen: aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Acc: aalgâ
    algâ+N+Sg+Ill: aalgân
    algâ+N+Sg+Loc: aalgâst
    algâ+N+Sg+Com: algáin
    algâ+N+Sg+Abe: algâttáá
    algâ+N+Ess: algân
    algâ+N+Par: algâd
    algâ+N+Pl+Nom: aalgah
    algâ+N+Pl+Gen: [aalgâi, algâi]
    algâ+N+Pl+Acc: aalgâid
    algâ+N+Pl+Ill: algáid
    algâ+N+Pl+Loc: aalgâin
    algâ+N+Pl+Com: [algâiguin, algâigijn]
    algâ+N+Pl+Abe: algâittáá


  Noun - robdâ:
    robdâ+N+Sg+Nom: robdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Gen: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Acc: roobdâ
    robdâ+N+Sg+Ill: roobdân
    robdâ+N+Sg+Loc: roobdâst
    robdâ+N+Sg+Com: robdáin
    robdâ+N+Sg+Abe: robdâttáá
    robdâ+N+Ess: robdân
    robdâ+N+Par: robdâd
    robdâ+N+Pl+Nom: roobdah
    robdâ+N+Pl+Gen: [roobdâi, robdâi]
    robdâ+N+Pl+Acc: roobdâid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Ill: robdáid
    robdâ+N+Pl+Loc: roobdâin
    robdâ+N+Pl+Com: [robdâiguin, robdâigijn]
    robdâ+N+Pl+Abe: robdâittáá
  
  Noun - árppu: # ok 
    árppu+N+Sg+Nom:  árppu
    árppu+N+Sg+Gen:  áárpu
    árppu+N+Sg+Acc:  áárpu
    árppu+N+Sg+Ill:  áárpun
    árppu+N+Sg+Loc:  áárpust
    árppu+N+Sg+Com:  árppoin
    árppu+N+Sg+Abe:  árputtáá
    árppu+N+Ess:  árppun
    árppu+N+Par:  árppud
    árppu+N+Pl+Nom:  áárpuh
    árppu+N+Pl+Gen: [áárpui, árpui]
    árppu+N+Pl+Acc:  áárpuid
    árppu+N+Pl+Ill:  árppoid
    árppu+N+Pl+Loc:  áárpuin
    árppu+N+Pl+Com:  [árpuiguin, árpuigijn]
    árppu+N+Pl+Abe:  árpuittáá

  Noun - rávsku: # ok 
    rávsku+N+Sg+Nom:  rávsku
    rávsku+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávsku
    rávsku+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávsku
    rávsku+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávskun
    rávsku+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávskust
    rávsku+N+Sg+Com:  rávskoin
    rávsku+N+Sg+Abe:  rávskuttáá
    rávsku+N+Ess:  rávskun
    rávsku+N+Par:  rávskud
    rávsku+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávskuh
    rávsku+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávskui, rávskui]
    rávsku+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávskuid
    rávsku+N+Pl+Ill:  rávskoid
    rávsku+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávskuin
    rávsku+N+Pl+Com:  [rávskuiguin, rávskuigijn]
    rávsku+N+Pl+Abe:  rávskuittáá

  Noun - hersku:
    hersku+v1+N+Sg+Nom:  hersku
    hersku+v1+N+Sg+Gen:  heersku
    hersku+v1+N+Sg+Acc:  heersku
    hersku+v1+N+Sg+Ill:  heerskun
    hersku+v1+N+Sg+Loc:  heerskust
    hersku+v1+N+Sg+Com:  herskoin
    hersku+v1+N+Sg+Abe:  herskuttáá
    hersku+v1+N+Ess:  herskun
    hersku+v1+N+Par:  herskud
    hersku+v1+N+Pl+Nom:  heerskuh
    hersku+v1+N+Pl+Gen: [heerskui, herskui]
    hersku+v1+N+Pl+Acc:  heerskuid
    hersku+v1+N+Pl+Ill:  herskoid
    hersku+v1+N+Pl+Loc:  heerskuin
    hersku+v1+N+Pl+Com:  [herskuiguin, herskuigijn]
    hersku+v1+N+Pl+Abe:  herskuittáá

  Noun - čáittu: # ok 
    čáittu+N+Sg+Nom:  čáittu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Gen:  čááitu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Acc:  čááitu
    čáittu+N+Sg+Ill:  čááitun
    čáittu+N+Sg+Loc:  čááitust
    čáittu+N+Sg+Com:  čáittoin
    čáittu+N+Sg+Abe:  čáituttáá
    čáittu+N+Ess:  čáittun
    čáittu+N+Par:  čáittud
    čáittu+N+Pl+Nom:  čááituh
    čáittu+N+Pl+Gen: [čááitui, čáitui]
    čáittu+N+Pl+Acc:  čááituid
    čáittu+N+Pl+Ill:  čáittoid
    čáittu+N+Pl+Loc:  čááituin
    čáittu+N+Pl+Com:  [čáituiguin, čáituigijn]
    čáittu+N+Pl+Abe:  čáituittáá

  Noun - valssâ:
    valssâ+N+Sg+Nom: valssâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Gen: vaalsâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Acc: vaalsâ
    valssâ+N+Sg+Ill: vaalsân
    valssâ+N+Sg+Loc: vaalsâst
    valssâ+N+Sg+Com: valssáin
    valssâ+N+Sg+Abe: valsâttáá
    valssâ+N+Ess: valssân
    valssâ+N+Par: valssâd
    valssâ+N+Pl+Nom: vaalsah
    valssâ+N+Pl+Gen: [vaalsâi, valsâi]
    valssâ+N+Pl+Acc: vaalsâid
    valssâ+N+Pl+Ill: valssáid
    valssâ+N+Pl+Loc: vaalsâin
    valssâ+N+Pl+Com: [valsâiguin, valsâigijn]
    valssâ+N+Pl+Abe: valsâittáá

  Noun - kurkkâ:
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: kurkkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: kuurkâ
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: kuurkân
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: kuurkâst
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Com: kurkkáin
    kurkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: kurkâttáá
    kurkkâ+N+Ess: kurkkân
    kurkkâ+N+Par: kurkkâd
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: kuurkah
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [kuurkâi, kurkâi]
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: kuurkâid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: kurkkáid
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: kuurkâin
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Com: [kurkâiguin, kurkâigijn]
    kurkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: kurkâittáá
  
  Noun - mirkkâ:
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: mirkkâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: miirhâ
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: miirkân
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: miirhâst
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Com: mirháin
    mirkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: mirhâttáá
    mirkkâ+N+Ess: mirkkân
    mirkkâ+N+Par: mirkkâd
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: miirhah
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [miirhâi, mirhâi]
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: miirhâid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: mirháid
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: miirhâin
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Com: [mirhâiguin, mirhâigijn]
    mirkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: mirhâittáá

  Noun - merkkâ:
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: merkkâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: meerhâ
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: meerkân
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: meerhâst
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Com: merháin
    merkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: merhâttáá
    merkkâ+N+Ess: merkkân
    merkkâ+N+Par: merkkâd
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: meerhah
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [meerhâi, merhâi]
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: meerhâid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: merháid
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: meerhâin
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Com: [merhâiguin, merhâigijn]
    merkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: merhâittáá


  Noun - lavkkâ:
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: lavkkâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: laavhâ
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: laavkân
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: laavhâst
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Com: lavháin
    lavkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: lavhâttáá
    lavkkâ+N+Ess: lavkkân
    lavkkâ+N+Par: lavkkâd
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: laavhah
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [laavhâi, lavhâi]
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: laavhâid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: lavháid
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: laavhâin
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Com: [lavhâiguin, lavhâigijn]
    lavkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: lavhâittáá

  Noun - korkkâ:
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: korkkâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: koorhâ
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: koorkân
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: koorhâst
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Com: korháin
    korkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: korhâttáá
    korkkâ+N+Ess: korkkân
    korkkâ+N+Par: korkkâd
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: koorhah
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [koorhâi, korhâi]
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: koorhâid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: korháid
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: koorhâin
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Com: [korhâiguin, korhâigijn]
    korkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: korhâittáá

  Noun - tulkkâ:
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Nom: tulkkâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Gen: tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Acc: tuulhâ
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Ill: tuulkân
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Loc: tuulhâst
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Com: tulháin
    tulkkâ+N+Sg+Abe: tulhâttáá
    tulkkâ+N+Ess: tulkkân
    tulkkâ+N+Par: tulkkâd
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Nom: tuulhah
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [tuulhâi, tulhâi]
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Acc: tuulhâid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Ill: tulháid
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Loc: tuulhâin
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Com: [tulhâiguin, tulhâigijn]
    tulkkâ+N+Pl+Abe: tulhâittáá

  Noun - jotkâ:
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Nom: jotkâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Gen: joođhâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Acc: joođhâ
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Ill: jootkân
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Loc: joođhâst
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Com: jođháin
    jotkâ+N+Sg+Abe: jođhâttáá
    jotkâ+N+Ess: jotkân
    jotkâ+N+Par: jotkâd
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Nom: joođhah
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Gen: [joođhâi, jođhâi]
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Acc: joođhâid
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Ill: jođháid
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Loc: joođhâin
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Com: [jođhâiguin, jođhâigijn]
    jotkâ+N+Pl+Abe: jođhâittáá

  Noun - láigu: # ok LAIGU
    láigu+N+Sg+Nom:  láigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Gen:  lááigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Acc:  lááigu
    láigu+N+Sg+Ill:  lááigun
    láigu+N+Sg+Loc:  lááigust
    láigu+N+Sg+Com:  láigoin
    láigu+N+Sg+Abe:  láiguttáá
    láigu+N+Ess:  láigun
    láigu+N+Par:  láigud
    láigu+N+Pl+Nom:  lááiguh
    láigu+N+Pl+Gen: [lááigui, láigui]
    láigu+N+Pl+Acc:  lááiguid
    láigu+N+Pl+Ill:  láigoid
    láigu+N+Pl+Loc:  lááiguin
    láigu+N+Pl+Com:  [láiguiguin, láiguigijn]
    láigu+N+Pl+Abe:  láiguittáá

  Noun - sáigu: # ok LAIGU
    sáigu+N+Sg+Nom:  sáigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Gen:  sááigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Acc:  sááigu
    sáigu+N+Sg+Ill:  sááigun
    sáigu+N+Sg+Loc:  sááigust
    sáigu+N+Sg+Com:  sáigoin
    sáigu+N+Sg+Abe:  sáiguttáá
    sáigu+N+Ess:  sáigun
    sáigu+N+Par:  sáigud
    sáigu+N+Pl+Nom:  sááiguh
    sáigu+N+Pl+Gen: [sááigui, sáigui]
    sáigu+N+Pl+Acc:  sááiguid
    sáigu+N+Pl+Ill:  sáigoid
    sáigu+N+Pl+Loc:  sááiguin
    sáigu+N+Pl+Com:  [sáiguiguin, sáiguigijn]
    sáigu+N+Pl+Abe:  sáiguittáá

  Noun - áimu: # ok LAIGU
    áimu+N+Sg+Nom:  áimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááimu
    áimu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááimun
    áimu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááimust
    áimu+N+Sg+Com:  áimoin
    áimu+N+Sg+Abe:  áimuttáá
    áimu+N+Ess:  áimun
    áimu+N+Par:  áimud
    áimu+N+Pl+Nom:  ááimuh
    áimu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááimui, áimui]
    áimu+N+Pl+Acc:  ááimuid
    áimu+N+Pl+Ill:  áimoid
    áimu+N+Pl+Loc:  ááimuin
    áimu+N+Pl+Com:  [áimuiguin, áimuigijn]
    áimu+N+Pl+Abe:  áimuittáá


  Noun - váimu: # ok LAIGU
    váimu+N+Sg+Nom:  váimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Gen:  vááimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Acc:  vááimu
    váimu+N+Sg+Ill:  vááimun
    váimu+N+Sg+Loc:  vááimust
    váimu+N+Sg+Com:  váimoin
    váimu+N+Sg+Abe:  váimuttáá
    váimu+N+Ess:  váimun
    váimu+N+Par:  váimud
    váimu+N+Pl+Nom:  vááimuh
    váimu+N+Pl+Gen: [vááimui, váimui]
    váimu+N+Pl+Acc:  vááimuid
    váimu+N+Pl+Ill:  váimoid
    váimu+N+Pl+Loc:  vááimuin
    váimu+N+Pl+Com:  [váimuiguin, váimuigijn]
    váimu+N+Pl+Abe:  váimuittáá

  Noun - áiru: # ok LAIGU
    áiru+N+Sg+Nom:  áiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Gen:  ááiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Acc:  ááiru
    áiru+N+Sg+Ill:  ááirun
    áiru+N+Sg+Loc:  ááirust
    áiru+N+Sg+Com:  áiroin
    áiru+N+Sg+Abe:  áiruttáá
    áiru+N+Ess:  áirun
    áiru+N+Par:  áirud
    áiru+N+Pl+Nom:  ááiruh
    áiru+N+Pl+Gen: [ááirui, áirui]
    áiru+N+Pl+Acc:  ááiruid
    áiru+N+Pl+Ill:  áiroid
    áiru+N+Pl+Loc:  ááiruin
    áiru+N+Pl+Com:  [áiruiguin, áiruigijn]
    áiru+N+Pl+Abe:  áiruittáá

  Noun - káivu: # OK LAIGU
    káivu+N+Sg+Nom:  káivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Gen:  kááivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Acc:  kááivu
    káivu+N+Sg+Ill:  kááivun
    káivu+N+Sg+Loc:  kááivust
    káivu+N+Sg+Com:  káivoin
    káivu+N+Sg+Abe:  káivuttáá
    káivu+N+Ess:  káivun
    káivu+N+Par:  káivud
    káivu+N+Pl+Nom:  kááivuh
    káivu+N+Pl+Gen: [kááivui, káivui]
    káivu+N+Pl+Acc:  kááivuid
    káivu+N+Pl+Ill:  káivoid
    káivu+N+Pl+Loc:  kááivuin
    káivu+N+Pl+Com:  [káivuiguin, káivuigijn]
    káivu+N+Pl+Abe:  káivuittáá

  Noun - tárbu: #ok LAIGU
    tárbu+N+Sg+Nom:  tárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Gen:  táárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Acc:  táárbu
    tárbu+N+Sg+Ill:  táárbun
    tárbu+N+Sg+Loc:  táárbust
    tárbu+N+Sg+Com:  tárboin
    tárbu+N+Sg+Abe:  tárbuttáá
    tárbu+N+Ess:  tárbun
    tárbu+N+Par:  tárbud
    tárbu+N+Pl+Nom:  táárbuh
    tárbu+N+Pl+Gen: [táárbui, tárbui]
    tárbu+N+Pl+Acc:  táárbuid
    tárbu+N+Pl+Ill:  tárboid
    tárbu+N+Pl+Loc:  táárbuin
    tárbu+N+Pl+Com:  [tárbuiguin, tárbuigijn]
    tárbu+N+Pl+Abe:  tárbuittáá

  Noun - áldu: # ok LAIGU
    áldu+N+Sg+Nom:  áldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Gen:  ááldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Acc:  ááldu
    áldu+N+Sg+Ill:  ááldun
    áldu+N+Sg+Loc:  ááldust
    áldu+N+Sg+Com:  áldoin
    áldu+N+Sg+Abe:  álduttáá
    áldu+N+Ess:  áldun
    áldu+N+Par:  áldud
    áldu+N+Pl+Nom:  áálduh
    áldu+N+Pl+Gen: [ááldui, áldui]
    áldu+N+Pl+Acc:  áálduid
    áldu+N+Pl+Ill:  áldoid
    áldu+N+Pl+Loc:  áálduin
    áldu+N+Pl+Com:  [álduiguin, álduigijn]
    áldu+N+Pl+Abe:  álduittáá

  Noun - rávdu: # ok LAIGU
    rávdu+N+Sg+Nom:  rávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Gen:  ráávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Acc:  ráávdu
    rávdu+N+Sg+Ill:  ráávdun
    rávdu+N+Sg+Loc:  ráávdust
    rávdu+N+Sg+Com:  rávdoin
    rávdu+N+Sg+Abe:  rávduttáá
    rávdu+N+Ess:  rávdun
    rávdu+N+Par:  rávdud
    rávdu+N+Pl+Nom:  ráávduh
    rávdu+N+Pl+Gen: [ráávdui, rávdui]
    rávdu+N+Pl+Acc:  ráávduid
    rávdu+N+Pl+Ill:  rávdoid
    rávdu+N+Pl+Loc:  ráávduin
    rávdu+N+Pl+Com:  [rávduiguin, rávduigijn]
    rávdu+N+Pl+Abe:  rávduittáá
